srcV2/esu.lexc
LEXICON VerbPostbase
VerbInflection;

-[V→N]-[N][Rel][SgUnpd]:%<%<%%%:(e)m              EncliticOrEnd; ! V-ing (understood in nominal sense); V-ness
-@+paa|~vaa[V][XCLM]:%<@⁵+p|~vaa          EncliticOrEnd; ! oh, how V!; my, how V!
-@+pag|~vag[V][XCLM]:%<@⁵+p|~vag          EncliticOrEnd; ! (HBC form) oh, how V!; my, how V!

!-–lria|@ngur*[V→N]:%<–lria|@⁴+ngur*             NounPostbase; ! the one who is V-ing
!-–lria[V→N]:%<–lria                             NounPostbase; ! the one who is V-ing
!-–lrii[V→N]:%<–lrii                             NounPostbase; ! the one who is V-ing (used with endings %:(e)m, %:(e)t, and all dual endings)
!-@ngur*[V→N]:%<@⁴ngur*                          NounPostbase; ! one that is V; one that is V-ing

-@~+na²[V→V]:%<@¹~+na                            SubordinativeVerbInflection; ! in order to V; for the purpose of V-ing
-@+pag|~vag¹[V→V]:%<@⁵+p|~vag                   InterrogativeVerbInflection; ! to V so well    ! interrogative mood only
-+peke|.vke[V→V]:%<+p|.vke°                     SubordinativeVerbInflection; ! to not V   
-+pege|.vke[V→V]:%<+p|.vge°                     SubordinativeVerbInflection; ! (NI, HBC, NUN form) to not V
-–qaqe¹[V→V]:%<–q̲araqe                          SubordinativeVerbInflection; ! to V now and then; to V intermittently
!-–rraar[V→V]:%<–r̲r̲aar                           SubordinativeVerbInflection; ! to V first; to V before doing something else; after V-ing
!-–rraar[V→V]:%<–r̲r̲aar                           OptativeVerbInflection; ! to V first; to V before doing something else; after V-ing

-–a|–ar|–aa|+a|+aar[V→V]:%<+a|+aar             VerbPostbase; ! to V repeatedly
-+`(g)aqe[V→V]:%<+`(g)aqe                      VerbPostbase; ! to usually V; to repeatedly V; to habitually V
-+`(g)ar(ar)[V→V]:%<+`(g)ar(ar)                VerbPostbase; ! meaning dependent on type of noun or verb base on which this postbase is used
-@+(g)ar(ar)te¹[V→V]:%<@+–`(g)ar(ar)te         VerbPostbase; ! to suddenly or immediately V; to V with short duration of action
-+`(g)arkaqe[V→V]:%<+`(g)arkaqe                VerbPostbase; ! will V (it); should V (it); to V (it) in the future
-+`(g)arkau[V→V]:%<+`(g)arkau                  VerbPostbase; ! will eventually V or be V-ed; should V or be V-ed; is supposed to V or be V-ed; to V in the future
-+`(g)arkaunrir[V→V]:%<+`(g)arkaunrir          VerbPostbase; ! to now be unable to V; to not be able or fit to V in the V future
-+aur(ar)[V→V]:%<+aur(ar)                      VerbPostbase; ! to continue V-ing over a period of time
-@~+caar(ar)[V→V]:%<@⁴~+caar(ar)               VerbPostbase; ! to endeavor to V, to undertake the act of V-ing, to try to V (with a high probability of success)
-@+car[V→V]:%<@+car                            VerbPostbase; ! to cause to V, to try to induce to V
-@~+cetaar[V→V]:%<@⁵~+cetaar                   VerbPostbase; ! to try to cause one to V
-@+cete¹|.vkar[V→V]:%<@⁵+cete|.vkar            VerbPostbase; ! to let, allow, permit, cause, or compel one to V
-@~+ciar(ar)[V→V]:%<@⁵~+ciar(ar)               VerbPostbase; ! to wait patiently for object to V
-+(s)ciigali[V→V]:%<+(s)ciigali                VerbPostbase; ! to not be able to V any longer
-+(s)ciigalli[V→V]:%<+(s)ciigalli              VerbPostbase; ! to not be able to V any longer
-+(s)ciigate[V→V]:%<+(s)ciigate°               VerbPostbase; ! to not be able to V
-@%:(u)ciirute[V→V]:%<@³%:(u)ciirute           VerbPostbase; ! to become unknowing concerning whether or how one is V-ing
-@%:(u)ciite[V→V]:%<@³%:(u)ciite°              VerbPostbase; ! to not know whether one is V-ing, to not know how one is with respect to V-ing
-–cilli[V→V]:%<–cilli                          VerbPostbase; ! to appear to have been V-ing; to appear to have been V-ed
-+ciqe|@ciiqe[V→V]:%<+ciqe|@⁵ciiqe             VerbPostbase; ! to V in the future; will V
-+ciqiar|@ciiqiar[V→V]:%<+ciqiar|@⁵ciiqiar     VerbPostbase; ! to be about to V; to be going to V
-+ciqli|@ciiqli[V→V]:%<+ciqli|@⁵ciiqli         VerbPostbase; ! to probably be going to V
-@~+cir¹[V→V]:%<@⁵~+cir                        VerbPostbase; ! to let (it) V; to wait for (it) to V; to make (it) V
-+(s)cir²[V→V]:%<+(s)cir                       VerbPostbase; ! to get V-ed (usually to one's detriment)
-+(s)ciryar[V→V]:%<+(s)ciryar                  VerbPostbase; ! to be easily V-ed
-@~+citaar[V→V]:%<@⁵~+citaar                   VerbPostbase; ! to try to cause one to V
-@+cite¹[V→V]:%<@⁵+cite                        VerbPostbase; ! to let, allow, permit, cause, compel one to V
-+cite²[V→V]:%<+cite°                          VerbPostbase; ! to have the quality of V or N
-@%:(u)cite³[V→V]:%<@³%:(u)cite                VerbPostbase; ! to V in place of, instead of, or for (him) (but not in the sense of `for the sake of')
-+(s)ciur[V→V]:%<+(s)ciur                      VerbPostbase; ! to get V-ed (usually to one's detriment)
-@–ckegg[V→V]:%<@⁵–ckegg                       VerbPostbase; ! to be very V
-–curlag[V→V]:%<–curlag                        VerbPostbase; ! to be interfered with while V-ing; to V with unsatisfactory results
-@+(r|l)i¹[V→V]:%<@+(r|l)i                     VerbPostbase; ! to become or cause to become V
-+`(g)i²[V→V]:%<+`(g)i                         VerbPostbase; ! to V something; to do some V-ing; to suffer the V-ing of something
-@~+(ng)iinar[V→V]:%<@²~+(ng)iinar             VerbPostbase; ! to V more and more
-%:(ng)illiqe[V→V]:%<%:(ng)illiqe              VerbPostbase; ! to suffer from the lack of N or V
-–inar[V→V]:%<–inar                            VerbPostbase; ! to finally V
-%:(ng)ir²[V→V]:%<%:(ng)ir                     VerbPostbase; ! to un-V
-%:(ng)i%:rute[V→V]:%<%:(ng)i%:rute            VerbPostbase; ! to no longer be V (adjectival verbs only)
-%:(ng)ite¹[V→V]:%<%:(ng)ite°                  VerbPostbase; ! to lack N or V; to have no N or V
-–kaca(g)ar[V→V]:%<–kacaġar                    VerbPostbase; ! to be very V
-–kacagar[V→V]:%<–kacagar                      VerbPostbase; ! to be very V
-–kacgar[V→V]:%<–kacgar                        VerbPostbase; ! to be very V
-+kaniir(ar)[V→V]:%<+kaniir(ar)                VerbPostbase; ! to become more V
-+kanir[V→V]:%<+kanir                          VerbPostbase; ! to V more with greater intensity
-+kanir(ar)[V→V]:%<+kanir(ar)                  VerbPostbase; ! to V more and more, with greater intensity
-–@kaunrir[V→V]:%<–@⁴k̲aunrir                  VerbPostbase; ! to be unable to V on account of some inhibiting factor
-–kayag[V→V]:%<–kayag                          VerbPostbase; ! to V (of "darned" one, one toward whom the speaker has negative feelings)
-–keckacagar[V→V]:%<–keckacagar                VerbPostbase; ! to be very V
-@–ke³[V→V]:%<@⁴–ke                            VerbPostbase; ! to find (it) to be V
-–ke⁴[V→V]:%<–k̲e                              VerbPostbase; ! to feel V toward (him/it); to V (object)
-@~–kenge[V→V]:%<@⁵~–kenge                     VerbPostbase; ! to V something
-–knig[V→V]:%<–knig                            VerbPostbase; ! to suddenly V (motion)
-–ksaar(ar)[V→V]:%<–ksaar(ar)                  VerbPostbase; ! to V in a small and unnoticeable way
-–ksaite[V→V]:%<–k̲saite°                      VerbPostbase; ! to not have V-ed (yet)
-–ksaitelar[V→V]:%<–k̲saitelar                 VerbPostbase; ! to have never V-ed
-–ksaitlar[V→V]:%<–k̲saitlar                   VerbPostbase; ! to have never V-ed
-–ksuar(ar)[V→V]:%<–k̲suar(ar)                 VerbPostbase; ! to V in a small and not very noticeable way
-–ksuar(ar)[V→V]:%<–ksuar(ar)                  VerbPostbase; ! to V in a small and not very noticeable way
-–kugte[V→V]:%<–kugte                          VerbPostbase; ! to be about to V; to be going to V; to plan to V
-–kuna[V→V]:%<–kuna                            VerbPostbase; ! to plan to V
-–kunayaaqe[V→V]:%<–kunayaaqe                  VerbPostbase; ! to consider V-ing; to think about V-ing
-–kutag[V→V]:%<–kutag                          VerbPostbase; ! to maybe be going to V; to probably V

LEXICON Exceptions
anuqaᵉ-?pag[N→V]:anuq%<'+vag    VerbPostbase; !
LEXICON VerbBase
acuniar                                        VerbPostbase; ! to rape; to have illicit sex with an unwilling or reluctant woman
aitaupag                                       VerbPostbase; ! to yawn a big yawn
aksar                                          VerbPostbase; ! to resist or pull back against a force which is pulling on one
amigpite                                       VerbPostbase; ! to form into two lines as a passageway for (him) to walk through
anirnake                                       VerbPostbase; ! to resent (it); to be infuriated by (it)
ariva¹:ariva                                   VerbPostbase; ! to argue
augurte                                        VerbPostbase; ! to get bloody
ayuqute                                        VerbPostbase; ! to treat (him in a certain way); to regard (him in a certain way)
capurau                                        VerbPostbase; ! to be weatherbound
ciirnarqe                                      VerbPostbase; ! to be sour
cive                                           VerbPostbase; ! to chase a seal or other sea mammal
egnia                                          VerbPostbase; ! to make plans for a trip
elpengcar                                      VerbPostbase; ! to notify; to make aware; to revive from unconsciousness
eritar                                         VerbPostbase; ! to pluck (feathers, fur, etc.)
ikasur                                         VerbPostbase; ! helper
inglupiar                                      VerbPostbase; ! one side only
ivua                                           VerbPostbase; ! to feel bad because someone did not give one a portion of their catch
kapgete                                        VerbPostbase; ! to be narrow
kemgiute                                       VerbPostbase; ! to have lost weight; to have removed the flesh from (it)
kingunge                                       VerbPostbase; ! to get an explanation; to understand
kuyug                                          VerbPostbase; ! to have sexual intercourse
manigcete:manigcete°                           VerbPostbase; ! to be smooth
merte                                          VerbPostbase; ! to sprinkle water on; to water (plants)
nalirrugte                                     VerbPostbase; ! to be undecided
nau¹:nau                                       VerbPostbase; ! to grow
nequkite                                       VerbPostbase; ! to be narrow
nuniate:nuniate°                               VerbPostbase; ! to be queasy
papsitaar                                      VerbPostbase; ! to tease
petugtur                                       VerbPostbase; ! to baste in sewing
pit'e¹:pit'e                                   VerbPostbase; ! to take game
qacalke                                        VerbPostbase; ! to fit in loosely
qanemyuugar                                    VerbPostbase; ! to complain
qayugarte                                      VerbPostbase; ! to crack when bending
qetermiar                                      VerbPostbase; ! to swim on one's back
qugnira                                        VerbPostbase; ! for there to be gusts of wind
quuyurni                                       VerbPostbase; ! to smile
takvig                                         VerbPostbase; ! pupil of the eye
tastuqite                                      VerbPostbase; ! to become stuck because an opening is too small to go through
tukar                                          VerbPostbase; ! to kick with both feet (from a lying position, as a baby does)
ugiyaqar                                       VerbPostbase; ! to run aground (accidently or purposely) with a boat
umruksuar                                      VerbPostbase; ! to tremble, shake
uyuruar                                        VerbPostbase; ! to hum or sing a wordless tune (especially when going out in the morning to check the weather)
